Hawaii statutes.
[§10H-7] No
diminishment of rights or privileges.
Nothing contained in this chapter shall diminish, alter, or amend any existing
rights or privileges enjoyed by the Native Hawaiian people that are not
inconsistent with this chapter. [L 2011, c 195, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next